Utah statutes.
34A-1-204.   Division directors -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Qualifications.

(1)  The chief officer of each division within the commission shall be a director, who shall serve as the executive and administrative head of the division.

(2)  A director shall be appointed by the commissioner with the concurrence of the governor and may be removed from that position at the will of the commissioner.

(3)  A director of a division shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(4) (a)  A director of a division shall be experienced in administration and possess such additional qualifications as determined by the commissioner.

(b)  In addition to the requirements imposed under Subsection (4)(a), the director of the Division of Adjudication shall be admitted to the practice of law in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

